California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) In implementing this section, the department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(d) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(e) (1) The department may
 modify any methodology or provision specified in this section to the extent it deems necessary to meet the requirements of federal law or regulations, to obtain or maintain federal approval, or to ensure federal financial participation is available or is not otherwise jeopardized, only if that modification does not violate the spirit, purposes, and intent of this section.

(2) If the department determines that a modification is necessary pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall consult with affected providers and stakeholders to the extent practicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 135.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.076.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for dates of service on or after January 1, 2024, the department shall adopt a rate year based on the calendar year for nursing facilities providing level A services in accordance with Sections 51120 and 51510 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, and intermediate care facilities that are licensed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) In implementing this section, the department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 136.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.08.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order to implement changes in the level of funding for radiology services, as defined in Section 51139 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, the director shall reduce reimbursement rates applicable to radiology services, as specified in this section.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, reimbursement rates applicable to
 radiology services shall not exceed 80 percent of the lowest maximum allowance established under the federal Medicare Program for the same or similar services with dates of service on or after October 1, 2010.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may take the actions specified in this section by means of a provider bulletin or notice, policy letter, or other similar instruction, without taking regulatory action.

(d) (1) The reimbursement rates provided for in this section shall be implemented only if the director determines that the rates, as established by this section, will comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements and that federal financial participation will be available.

(2) In assessing whether federal financial participation is available, the director shall determine whether the rates comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements, including those set forth in Section 1396a(a)(30)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) To the extent that the director determines that the rates do not comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements, the director shall retain the discretion not to implement that rate and may revise the rate as necessary to comply with the federal Medicaid requirements.

(e) The director shall seek any necessary federal approval for the implementation of this section. To the extent that federal financial participation is not available with respect to any rate of reimbursement described by this section, the director shall retain the discretion not to
 implement that rate and may revise the rate as necessary to comply with the federal Medicaid requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 717, Sec. 148.   (SB 853)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.09.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if subdivision (b) of Section 3.94 of the Budget Act of 2011 is operative, effective on or after January 1, 2012, the payment reductions in Sections 14105.07, 14105.192, 14126.033, 14131.05, and 14131.07 shall apply to managed care health plans that contract with the department pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591) and to contracts with the Senior Care Action
 Network and AIDS Healthcare Foundation, to the extent that the services are provided through any of these contracts, payments shall be reduced by the actuarial equivalent amount of the payment reductions pursuant to contract amendments or change orders effective on July 1, 2011, or thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 213.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to the extent permitted by federal law, reimbursement to hospitals for inpatient services rendered to Medi-Cal program beneficiaries between July 1, 1981 and June 30, 1982, shall be adjusted to provide that the average payment per discharge upon final settlement shall not exceed a rate of increase of 6 percent over the average payment per discharge at final settlement for services rendered during the period of July 1, 1980 to June 30, 1981.

(b) Interim payment rates to hospitals shall be adjusted
 on October 1, 1981, or as shortly thereafter as reasonably possible and consistent with federal law, to accomplish a rate of payment increase to hospitals for inpatient services for the period of July 1, 1981 to June 30, 1982, which is consistent with the provisions of this section.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the reimbursement principles employed by the department in final settlement pursuant to this section will be the methods in effect prior to October 1, 1981, for any services rendered prior to that time, and for services rendered between October 1, 1981, and June 30, 1982, that reimbursement principles be in accordance with the alternative methods adopted for use subsequent to October 1, 1981.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit adjustments to hospital reimbursement based upon volume or case mix changes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1163, Sec. 9.   Effective October 2, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.11.

(a) The department may negotiate settlements with acute care hospitals with psychiatric units that unintentionally violate Medi-Cal cost reimbursement policies or procedures governing the operation of acute psychiatric hospitals and that had, prior to the violations, been changed by the department.

(b) In any case to which this section applies, the department may waive all or part of the overpayments made under this chapter that would otherwise be reimbursable to the
 department by an acute care hospital.

(c) This section shall only apply to hospitals in counties of the 20th and 42nd classes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 639, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.115.

(a) The department may negotiate or renegotiate settlements with any acute care hospital in San Diego County that has a distinct part pediatric convalescent facility and that has violated any Medi-Cal reimbursement policy or procedure governing the operation of acute care hospitals.

(b) In any settlement negotiated or renegotiated pursuant to this section, the department may waive all or part of any overpayment made under this chapter to any acute care hospital described in
 subdivision (a) that would otherwise be reimbursable to the department by that acute care hospital.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 486, Sec. 1.   Effective September 12, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.12.

(a) The department shall specify circumstances under which requests shall be granted for authorization for services provided by a health facility licensed under subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code for periods of up to two years. This subdivision shall be implemented not later than July 1, 1994. The department shall consult with nursing facility providers and appropriate health care professionals in the development of the criteria and process for granting two-year authorizations pursuant to this
 subdivision.

(b) (1) As of July 1, 1997, the department shall specify circumstances under which requests shall be granted for authorization for services provided by a health facility licensed under subdivisions (e), (g), and (h) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code for periods up to two years. The department shall consult with facility providers cited in this subdivision and appropriate health care professionals in the development of the criteria and process for granting two-year authorizations pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) The department shall not implement paragraph (1) unless and until federal approval of a change in existing utilization control methods as provided in this section is obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 446, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.13.

(a) Private duty nursing agencies shall be a provider of skilled nursing services provided on a shift basis covered under the early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment supplemental and home- and community-based waiver programs, subject to federal approval and availability of federal financial participation. In addition to satisfying any other requirements as a condition to participating in the Medi-Cal program under this chapter, a private duty nursing agency licensed under Chapter 8.3 (commencing with Section 1743) of Division
 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall satisfy all of the following requirements:

(1) The agency shall be in compliance with the requirements of Chapter 8.3 (commencing with Section 1743) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and any regulations adopted under that chapter.

(2) The agency shall provide services as specified in Section 1743.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) The agency shall provide skilled nursing services on a shift basis in a patient’s home or other community-based site appropriate for patient care.

(b) The department shall request federal approval of an amendment to the existing nursing facility waiver and model nursing facility waiver in order to include private duty nursing agencies as a provider of skilled nursing services
 on a shift basis.

(c) The department shall review all other federally approved existing waivers that include home health care as a covered service and request federal approval for adding private duty nursing agencies as a provider of skilled nursing services provided on a shift basis, including home- and community-based waivers under Section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(c)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 242, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.15.

(a) (1) In determining rates of reimbursement for inpatient hospital services the department shall use the reimbursement policy existing on June 29, 1982. The director shall have authority to modify this reimbursement policy. The director shall implement a new reimbursement policy of peer grouping of hospitals through the promulgation of emergency regulations after required federal approvals are obtained. The department may adjust interim payment percentages to hospitals in order to approximate final settlement and
 may control or freeze charges in order to carry out this section.

(2) This section shall cease to apply to a hospital when the department enters into a contract, pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), either with that hospital or with other hospitals to the exclusion of that hospital for services covered under the contracts.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may make interim rate adjustments and also implement collection procedures to recover overpayments to hospitals, at tentative and final settlement. These recoveries shall be based on audits or examinations made by or on behalf of the department pursuant to Sections 10722 and 14170, including the application of Sections 51536, 51537, and 51539 of Title 22 of the California Administrative Code at tentative and final settlement. Recovery may be made whether or not appeals by the
 hospitals are pending. Collection of overpayments shall be made in accordance with Section 14172.5.

(c) The amendment of this section made at the 1985 portion of the 1985–86 Regular Session of the Legislature does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the existing law. This declaration shall not apply to any lawsuits filed on or before July 9, 1985.

(d) No new payment system may be implemented without specific authorization from the Legislature.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, reimbursement for out-of-state acute inpatient hospital services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries shall not exceed the current statewide average of contract rates for acute inpatient hospital services negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission or the actual billed charges, whichever is
 less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 245.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.16.

(a) The department may establish per diem or bundled reimbursement rates for pharmacies that provide home infusion supplies and services. The per diem or bundled reimbursement rate shall be budget neutral. Only pharmacies that comply with Sections 4127 and 4127.1 of the Business and Professions Code may be determined to be eligible for reimbursement rates established under this subdivision.

(b) In implementing this section the department shall consult with pharmacies providing
 home infusion supplies and services with respect to all of the following:

(1) Notifying the provider representatives of the proposed change.

(2) Scheduling at least one meeting to discuss the change.

(3) Obtaining actual costs from providers regarding supplies, services, and administrative costs.

(4) Allowing for written input regarding the change.

(5) Providing 30-day advance notice to providers on the implementation and effective date of the change.

(c) Changes made in the Medi-Cal program pursuant to this section are exempt from the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section
 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 525, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.17.

(a) Each hospital designated by the department as a critical access hospital, and certified as such by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services under the federal Medicare rural hospital flexibility program, shall be eligible for supplemental payments for Medi-Cal
 covered outpatient services rendered to Medi-Cal eligible persons.

(b) Payments made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be contingent upon receipt of federal financial participation, and shall be limited by the appropriation in the annual Budget Act for the nonfederal share of these payments. Supplemental payments shall be apportioned among critical access hospitals based upon their number of Medi-Cal outpatient visits.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as meaning that a critical access hospital is not a general acute care hospital.

(d) The department shall promptly seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. If necessary to obtain federal approval, the department may, for federal purposes, limit implementation of this section to those payments that are allowable
 expenses under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code). If federal approval is not obtained for implementation of this section, this section shall become inoperative.

(e) The department may adopt emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to implement this section. One initial adoption of the emergency regulations and one readoption of the initial regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the first readoption of those regulations shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to
 the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and publication in the California Code of Regulations, and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days. If the department adopts emergency regulations pursuant to this section, the department shall seek prior input from representatives of the hospital industry, including the California Healthcare Association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 70.   Effective July 7, 2000.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (d).)
-------------------------------------------

14105.18.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, provider rates of payment for services rendered in all of the following programs shall be identical to the rates of payment for the same service performed by the same provider type pursuant to the Medi-Cal program:

(1) The California Children’s Services Program established pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The Genetically Handicapped Persons Program established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 125125) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) The Breast and Cervical Cancer Early Detection Program established pursuant to Article 1.3 (commencing with Section 104150) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code and the breast cancer programs specified in Section 30461.6 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(4) The State-Only Family Planning Program established pursuant to Division 24 (commencing with Section 24000).

(5) The Family Planning, Access, Care, and Treatment (Family PACT) Program established pursuant to subdivision (aa) of Section 14132.

(6) The Healthy Families Program established pursuant to Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code if the health care services are provided by a Medi-Cal provider pursuant to subdivision (b) of
 Section 12693.26 of the Insurance Code.

(7) The Access for Infants and Mothers Program established pursuant to Part 6.3 (commencing with Section 12695) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code if the health care services are provided by a Medi-Cal provider.

(b) The director may identify in regulations other programs not listed in subdivision (a) in which providers shall be paid rates of payment that are identical to the rates of payments in the Medi-Cal program pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), services provided under any of the programs described in subdivisions (a) and (b) may be reimbursed at rates greater than the Medi-Cal rate that would otherwise be applicable if those rates are adopted by the director in regulations.

(d) Payment increases made pursuant to Section 14105.196 shall not apply to provider rates of payment described in this section for services provided to individuals not eligible for Medi-Cal or Family PACT.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 610.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.181.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “The Family Planning, Access, Care, and Treatment (Family PACT) waiver” or “Family PACT waiver” means the program described in subdivision (aa) of Section 14132, as approved by a federal demonstration waiver.

(2) “Comprehensive clinical family planning services” means those services described in paragraph (8) of subdivision (aa) of
 Section 14132.

(3) “Office visits” means those procedures billed under Common Procedure Terminology codes 99201, 99202, 99203, 99204, 99211, 99212, 99213, and 99214.

(b) Reimbursement rates for office visits billed as comprehensive clinical family planning services by Family PACT waiver providers and for office visits billed as family planning services by Medi-Cal providers shall receive a rate augmentation equal to the weighted average of at least 80 percent of the amount that the federal Medicare program reimburses for these same or similar office visits. The rate augmentation shall be based upon Medicare rates in effect on December 31, 2007.

(c) The augmentation of reimbursement rates described in subdivision (b) shall be made for office visits rendered on or after January 1, 2008.

(d) (1) The director may adopt regulations as necessary to implement this section. These regulations may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of this section, the adoption of the regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or the general welfare.

(2) As an alternative to paragraph (1), and notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the director may administer this section, in whole or in part, by means of a provider bulletin, or other similar
 instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 636, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.19.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order to implement changes in the level of funding for health care services, the director shall reduce provider payments as specified in this section.

(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (c), payments shall be reduced by 10 percent for Medi-Cal fee-for-service
 benefits for dates of service on and after July 1, 2008, through and including dates of service on February 28, 2009.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (c), payments shall be reduced by 10 percent for non-Medi-Cal programs described in Article 6 (commencing with Section 124025) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, and Section 14105.18 of this code, for dates of service on and after July 1, 2008, through and including dates of service on February 28, 2009.

(3) For managed health care plans that contract with the department pursuant to this chapter, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), and Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591), payments shall be reduced by the actuarial equivalent amount of the payment reduction specified in this subdivision pursuant to contract amendments or change orders effective on July 1, 2008.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), payment reductions set forth in this subdivision shall apply to small and rural hospitals, as defined in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code, for dates of service on and after July 1, 2008, through and including October 31, 2008.

(c) The services listed in this subdivision shall be exempt from the payment reductions specified in subdivision (b):

(1) Acute hospital inpatient services, except for payments to hospitals not under contract with the State Department of Health Care Services, as provided in Section 14166.245.

(2) Federally qualified health center services, including those facilities deemed to have federally qualified health center status pursuant to a waiver under subdivision (a) of Section 1315
 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) Rural health clinic services.

(4) All of the following facilities:

(A) A skilled nursing facility licensed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, except a skilled nursing facility that is a distinct part of a general acute care hospital. For purposes of this paragraph, “distinct part” has the same meaning as defined in Section 72041 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) An intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled licensed pursuant to subdivision (e), (g), or (h) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, or a facility providing continuous skilled nursing care to developmentally disabled individuals pursuant to the pilot project
 established by Section 14495.10.

(C) A subacute care unit, as defined in Section 51215.5 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(5) Payments to facilities owned or operated by the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services.

(6) Hospice.

(7) Contract services as designated by the director pursuant to subdivision (e).

(8) Payments to providers to the extent that the payments are funded by means of a certified public expenditure or an intergovernmental transfer pursuant to Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(9) Services pursuant to local
 assistance contracts and interagency agreements to the extent the funding is not included in the funds appropriated to the department in the annual Budget Act.

(10) Payments to Medi-Cal managed care plans pursuant to Section 4474.5 for services to consumers transitioning from Agnews Developmental Center into Alameda, San Mateo, and Santa Clara Counties pursuant to the Plan for the Closure of Agnews Developmental Center.

(11) Breast and cervical cancer treatment provided pursuant to Section 14007.71.

(12) The Family Planning, Access, Care, and Treatment (Family PACT) Waiver Program pursuant to Section 14105.18.

(d) Subject to the exception for services listed in subdivision (c), the payment reductions required by subdivision (b) shall apply to the
 services rendered by any provider who may be authorized to bill for the service, including, but not limited to, physicians, podiatrists, nurse practitioners, certified nurse-midwives, nurse anesthetists, and organized outpatient clinics.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of a provider bulletin, or similar instruction, without taking regulatory action.

(f) The reductions described in this section shall apply only to payments for services when the General Fund share of the payment is paid with funds directly appropriated to the department in the annual Budget Act and shall not apply to payments for services paid with funds appropriated to other departments or agencies.

(g) The
 department shall promptly seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 77.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.191.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order to implement changes in the level of funding for health care services, the director shall reduce provider payments, as specified in this section.

(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, payments shall be reduced by 1 percent for Medi-Cal
 fee-for-service benefits for dates of service on and after March 1, 2009.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (d), for dates of service on and after March 1, 2009, payments to the following classes of providers shall be reduced by 5 percent for Medi-Cal fee-for-service benefits:

(A) Intermediate care facilities, excluding those facilities identified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (d). For purposes of this section, “intermediate care facility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 51118 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Skilled nursing facilities that are distinct parts of general acute care hospitals. For purposes of this section, “distinct part” has the same meaning as defined in Section 72041 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(C) Rural swing-bed facilities.

(D) Subacute care units that are, or are parts of, distinct parts of general acute care hospitals. For purposes of this subparagraph, “subacute care unit” has the same meaning as defined in Section 51215.5 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(E) Pediatric subacute care units that are, or are parts of, distinct parts of general acute care hospitals. For purposes of this subparagraph, “pediatric subacute care unit” has the same meaning as defined in Section 51215.8 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(F) Adult day health care centers.

(3) Except as provided in subdivision (d), for dates of service on and after March 1, 2009, Medi-Cal
 fee-for-service payments to pharmacies shall be reduced by 5 percent.

(4) Except as provided in subdivision (d), payments shall be reduced by 1 percent for non-Medi-Cal programs described in Article 6 (commencing with Section 124025) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, and Section 14105.18, for dates of service on and after March 1, 2009.

(5) For managed health care plans that contract with the department pursuant to this chapter, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), and Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591), payments shall be reduced by the actuarial equivalent amount of the payment reductions specified in this subdivision pursuant to contract amendments or change orders effective on July 1, 2008, or thereafter.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section,
 payments to hospitals that are not under contract with the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081) for inpatient hospital services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries and that are subject to Section 14166.245 shall be governed by that section.

(d) To the extent applicable, the services, facilities, and payments listed in this subdivision shall be exempt from the payment reductions specified in subdivision (b):

(1) Acute hospital inpatient services that are paid under contracts pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081).

(2) Federally qualified health center services, including those facilities deemed to have federally qualified health center status pursuant to a waiver pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act (42
 U.S.C. Sec. 1315(a)).

(3) Rural health clinic services.

(4) Skilled nursing facilities licensed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code other than those specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(5) Intermediate care facilities for the developmentally disabled licensed pursuant to subdivision (e), (g), or (h) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, or facilities providing continuous skilled nursing care to developmentally disabled individuals pursuant to the pilot project established by Section 14495.10.

(6) Payments to facilities owned or operated by the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services.

(7) Hospice services.

(8) Contract services, as designated by the director pursuant to subdivision (g).

(9) Payments to providers to the extent that the payments are funded by means of a certified public expenditure or an intergovernmental transfer pursuant to Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(10) Services pursuant to local assistance contracts and interagency agreements to the extent the funding is not included in the funds appropriated to the department in the annual Budget Act.

(11) Payments to Medi-Cal managed care plans pursuant to Section 4474.5 for services to consumers transitioning from Agnews Developmental Center into the Counties of Alameda, San Mateo, and Santa Clara pursuant to the Plan for the
 Closure of Agnews Developmental Center.

(12) Breast and cervical cancer treatment provided pursuant to Section 14007.71 and as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.18 or Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 104160) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code.

(13) The Family Planning, Access, Care, and Treatment (Family PACT) Program pursuant to subdivision (aa) of Section 14132.

(14) Small and rural hospitals, as defined in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) Subject to the exemptions listed in subdivision (d), the payment reductions required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall apply to the benefits rendered by any provider who may be authorized to bill for provision of the benefit,
 including, but not limited to, physicians, podiatrists, nurse practitioners, certified nurse midwives, nurse anesthetists, and organized outpatient clinics.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Medi-Cal reimbursement rates applicable to the classes of providers identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), for services rendered during the 2009–10 rate year and each rate year thereafter, shall not exceed the reimbursement rates that were applicable to those classes of providers in the 2008–09 rate year.

(2) In addition to the classes of providers described in paragraph (1), Medi-Cal reimbursement rates applicable to the following classes of facilities for services rendered during the 2009–10 rate year, and each rate year thereafter, shall not exceed the reimbursement rates that were applicable to those facilities and services in the 2008–09
 rate year:

(A) Facilities identified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (d).

(B) Freestanding pediatric subacute care units, as defined in Section 51215.8 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) Paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not apply to providers that are paid pursuant to Article 3.8 (commencing with Section 14126), or to services, facilities, and payments specified in subdivision (d), with the exception of facilities described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (d).

(4) The limitation set forth in this subdivision shall be applied only after the reductions in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) have been made.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1
 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement and administer this section by means of provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(h) The reductions and limitations described in this section shall apply only to payments for benefits when the General Fund share of the payment is paid with funds directly appropriated to the department in the annual Budget Act, and shall not apply to payments for benefits paid with funds appropriated to other departments or agencies.

(i) The department shall promptly seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. To the extent that federal financial participation is not available with respect to any payment that is reduced or limited pursuant to this section, the director may elect not to implement that reduction or limitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 78.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.192.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Costs within the Medi-Cal program continue to grow due to the rising cost of providing health care throughout the state and also due to increases in enrollment, which are more pronounced during difficult economic times.

(2) In order to minimize the need for drastically cutting enrollment standards or benefits during times of economic crisis, it is crucial to find areas within the Medi-Cal program that have reimbursement levels higher than required under the standard provided in Section 1902(a)(30)(A) of the federal Social Security Act and may be reduced in accordance with federal law.

(3) The Medi-Cal program delivers its services and benefits to Medi-Cal beneficiaries through a wide variety of health care providers, some of which deliver care via managed care or other contract models while others do so through fee-for-service arrangements.

(4) The setting of rates within the Medi-Cal program is complex and subject to close supervision by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(5) As the single state agency for the Medicaid program in California, the department has unique expertise that can inform decisions that set or adjust reimbursement methodologies and levels consistent with the requirements of federal law.

(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature for the department to analyze and identify where
 reimbursement levels can be reduced consistent with the standard provided in Section 1902(a)(30)(A) of the federal Social Security Act and consistent with federal and state law and policies, including exemptions contained in the act that added this section, provided that the reductions in reimbursement shall not exceed 10 percent on an aggregate basis for all providers, services, and products.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the director shall adjust provider payments, as specified in this section.

(d) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, payments shall be reduced by 10 percent for Medi-Cal fee-for-service benefits for dates of service on and after June 1, 2011.

(2) For managed health care plans that contract with the department pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing
 with Section 14200), except contracts with Senior Care Action Network and AIDS Healthcare Foundation, payments shall be reduced by the actuarial equivalent amount of the payment reductions specified in this section pursuant to contract amendments or change orders effective on July 1, 2011, or thereafter.

(3) Payments shall be reduced by 10 percent for non-Medi-Cal programs described in Article 6 (commencing with Section 124025) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, and Section 14105.18, for dates of service on and after June 1, 2011. This paragraph shall not apply to inpatient hospital services provided in a hospital that is paid under contract pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081).

(4) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, the director may adjust the payments specified in paragraphs (1) and (3) with respect to